District of Columbia statutes.
3-1204.05

Officers; meetings; quorum.

(a)

From among the members of each board and advisory committee, the Mayor shall designate a chairperson.

(b)

Each board and advisory committee shall determine the times and places of its meetings and shall publish notice of regular meetings at least 1 week in advance in the District of Columbia Register.

(c)

A majority of the appointed members of each board and advisory committee shall constitute a quorum.

(d)

An affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum shall be required to approve a measure before a board.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 405, 33 DCR 729
July 18, 2009, D.C. Law 18-26, § 2(d)(2), 56 DCR 4043
1981 Ed., § 2-3304.5.
D.C. Law 18-26, in subsec. (c), substituted “appointed members” for “members”; and added subsec. (d).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(d)(2) of Health Occupations Revision General Amendment Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-146, July 28, 2009, 56 DCR 6308).